Illinois, session 104th, HB780.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Broadband Infrastructure Advancement Act is 5amended by changing Section 4-1 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 81/4-1)7    Sec. 4-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Broadband Infrastructure Advancement Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.)